Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1732
Offstreet parking; location; powers; limitation.

Any city of the metropolitan class is authorized to own, purchase, construct, equip, lease, or operate within such city offstreet motor vehicle parking facilities on property located beneath any elevated segment of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or portion thereof, or public property title to which is held by the city on May 7, 1971, or property owned by the city and used in conjunction with and incidental to city-operated facilities, or on property situated so as to serve business in the central business district, or business in long-established outlying neighborhood business districts for the use of the general public. The grant of power in this section does not include the power to engage, directly or indirectly, in the sale of gasoline, oil, or other merchandise or in the furnishing of any service other than that of parking motor vehicles as provided in this section. Any such city shall have the authority to acquire by grant, contract, or purchase, as provided by law for such acquisition, all real or personal property, including a site or sites on which to construct such facilities, necessary or convenient in the carrying out of this grant of power.

Laws 1971, LB 238, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 238, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 315.